Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE F. LOCAL REGULATION OF PUBLIC HEALTH

CHAPTER 122. POWERS AND DUTIES OF COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES RELATING TO PUBLIC HEALTH

Sec. 122.001. COUNTY FUNDING FOR PUBLIC HEALTH AND SANITATION. The commissioners court of a county may appropriate and spend money from the county general revenues for public health and sanitation in the county.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 122.002. HEALTH UNIT IN COUNTY WITH POPULATION OF LESS THAN 22,000. (a) The commissioners court of a county with a population of less than 22,000 may impose an ad valorem tax at a rate not to exceed five cents on each $100 of the taxable value of property taxable by the county for:

(1) the creation of a county health unit;

(2) vaccines and medical services required to immunize schoolchildren and indigent persons from communicable diseases; and

(3) medical treatment for indigent persons who are not entitled to treatment under Chapter 61 (Indigent Health Care and Treatment Act).

(b) This section is effective for a county only if it is approved by a majority of the voters of the county at an election called for that purpose by the commissioners court on receipt of a petition signed by at least five percent of the property taxpaying voters in the county.

(c) The commissioners court may pay not more than half of the costs of medical treatment and immunization for an indigent person who is not entitled to treatment under Chapter 61 (Indigent Health Care and Treatment Act).

(d) A commissioners court that creates a county health unit under this section shall create a county health unit fund. The proceeds of the tax shall be deposited to the credit of that fund. Amounts in the fund shall be used for the purposes for which the commissioners court may impose a tax under Subsection (a).

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 122.003. HEALTH UNIT IN COUNTY WITH POPULATION OF 22,200 TO 22,500. (a) The commissioners court of a county with a population of 22,200 to 22,500 may impose an ad valorem tax at a rate not to exceed 10 cents on each $100 of the taxable value of property taxable by the county for:

(1) the creation of a county health unit;

(2) vaccines and medical services required to immunize schoolchildren and indigent persons from communicable diseases; and

(3) medical treatment or hospitalization of indigent persons who are not entitled to treatment or hospitalization under Chapter 61 (Indigent Health Care and Treatment Act).

(b) The commissioners court may pay not more than half of the costs of medical treatment or hospitalization for an indigent person who is not entitled to treatment under Chapter 61 (Indigent Health Care and Treatment Act).

(c) A commissioners court that creates a county health unit under this section shall create a county health unit fund. The proceeds of the tax shall be deposited to the credit of that fund. Amounts in the fund shall be used for the purposes for which the commissioners court may impose a tax under Subsection (a).

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 122.004. APPROPRIATION TO HOSPITAL ESTABLISHED BY DONATION. If a fund of at least $50,000 is left by will or otherwise to establish and maintain a hospital in a municipality with a population of at least 10,000, the governing body of that municipality or the commissioners court of the county in which the municipality is located may make an appropriation to the hospital, in an amount that the governing body or commissioners court considers proper, to provide hospitalization and medical and surgical services for indigent residents of the municipality or county who are sick or wounded.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 122.005. POWERS OF TYPE A GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITY. (a) The governing body of a Type A general-law municipality may take any action necessary or expedient to promote health or suppress disease, including actions to:

(1) prevent the introduction of a communicable disease into the municipality, including stopping, detaining, and examining a person coming from a place that is infected or believed to be infected with a communicable disease;

(2) establish, maintain, and regulate hospitals in the municipality or in any area within five miles of the municipal limits; or

(3) abate any nuisance that is or may become injurious to the public health.

(b) The governing body of a Type A general-law municipality may adopt rules:

(1) necessary or expedient to promote health or suppress disease; or

(2) to prevent the introduction of a communicable disease into the municipality, including quarantine rules, and may enforce those rules in the municipality and in any area within 10 miles of the municipality.

(c) The governing body of a Type A general-law municipality may fine a person who fails or refuses to observe the orders and rules of the health authority.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 122.006. POWERS OF HOME-RULE MUNICIPALITIES. A home-rule municipality may:

(1) adopt rules to protect the health of persons in the municipality, including quarantine rules to protect the residents against communicable disease; and

(2) provide for the establishment of quarantine stations, emergency hospitals, and other hospitals.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 122.007. ESTABLISHMENT OF MEDICAL CLINICS IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) The commissioners court of a county with a population of less than 20,000 may establish a medical clinic for the provision of health care services.

(b) The commissioners court may determine the types of health care services to be provided at the clinic, including medical care and treatment provided by a licensed physician, nursing care provided by a registered nurse, and dental care provided by a licensed dentist.

(c) The commissioners court may:

(1) purchase land on which to construct the clinic;

(2) construct the clinic, lease space for the clinic, or purchase and develop an existing building for the clinic; and

(3) operate or contract for the operation of the clinic.

(d) A county with a population of less than 20,000 that constructs a medical clinic under this section may continue to operate the clinic and exercise the powers provided by this section after the county exceeds that population.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 758, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 122.008. EMPLOYMENT FOR PUBLIC SCHOOLS AND COMPENSATION. (a) The commissioners court of a county may employ one or more registered nurses to visit the public schools in the county.

(b) A nurse employed under Subsection (a) shall:

(1) investigate the health conditions and sanitary surroundings of the schools and the personal, physical, and health condition of students in the schools;

(2) cooperate with the department and local health authorities; and

(3) perform other duties required by the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0377, eff. April 2, 2015.